Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF297.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; ARROWHEAD ECONOMIC OPPORTUNITY AGENCY.new text end new text begin $2,000,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of the Minnesota Housing Finance Agency for a grant to the Arrowhead Economic Opportunity Agency. The grant recipient must use grant money as a revolving fund for acquiring and rehabilitating tax-forfeited properties for owner occupancy. Housing funded with this grant must be affordable to the local work force. This is a onetime appropriation. new text end